Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7306
Gender-altering procedures; state funds; use prohibited, when.

State funds shall not be directly or indirectly used, granted, paid, or distributed to any entity, organization, or individual for providing gender-altering procedures to an individual younger than nineteen years of age in violation of the Let Them Grow Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 19.